Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1289] SNOWMOBILE SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue snowmobile special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays special plate fees under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) contributes $....... upon initial application and a minimum of $....... annually to the snowmobile trails and enforcement account under section 84.83, subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design in consultation with representatives from the Minnesota United Snowmobilers Association. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates may be transferred to another qualified motor vehicle that is registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 84.83, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), all money collected under subdivision 1, clause (5), is appropriated to the commissioner of natural resources for grants-in-aid to develop, maintain, and groom snowmobile trails and acquire easements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for special plates issued on or after that date. new text end